 “We currently have mice that are four months old that used to be diabetic and are no longer diabetic,” he added.
 The research is still in its early stages, as Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor in the Faculty of Medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and director of the Clinical and Scientific Department of the Canadian Diabetes Association, points out.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about whether diabetes can be cured and points out that these findings are not relevant to those who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, permanent secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Committee, publicly stated on Sveriges Radio in Sweden that, unable to contact Bob Dylan directly to inform him of the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature, the committee had abandoned its efforts to reach him.
 Danius said: “At the moment we are not doing anything. I called and emailed his closest aide and received very cordial replies. For the time being, that is certainly enough.”
 Previously, Ring's CEO, Jamie Siminoff, mentioned that the company had started out after the bell of his entrance could not be heard from the store he had set up in his garage.
 He said he built a wifi bell.
 Siminoff said sales skyrocketed after his appearance on Shark Tank in 2013, when the TV show's panel refused to fund the company's launch.
 Towards the end of 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the litigation with the competing security company, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been proven to be effective in treating the existing infection caused by Ebola, although there is an experimental vaccine that appears to be able to decrease mortality caused by the disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had a promising early field result, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected at preventing death.
 In the PALM trial, the function of Zmapp was a control, meaning that scientists used it as a baseline and compared it to the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics supports the United States Olympic Committee’s statement and recognizes that it is imperative that the Olympic family foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be best served by moving forward with meaningful changes within our organization, rather than withdrawing certifications.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse that Larry Nassar's survivors so bravely described could have gone on for so long without being seen and accepts any necessary and appropriate changes.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and USOC is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for athletes to pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and enhanced environment.
 In the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an adviser and later for the government of Lyndon B. Johnson.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy in the 1976 election, and later served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981, succeeding Henry Kissinger.
 As national security adviser, he assisted Carter in the diplomatic handling of international affairs, such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution of 1979, which led to a hostage crisis in Iran, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress, respectively.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing and Best Original Screenplay.
 There were two nominations for Best Original Song: Audition (The Fools Who Dream) and City of Stars. The studio Lionsgate was nominated 26 times, more than any other studio.
 On Sunday night, in a statement made through the press secretary, the President of the United States of America, Donald Trump, announced that the US troops would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey would also take over the surveillance of ISIS militants who were captured, whom European nations, according to the statement, denied their repatriation.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory already widely accepted, it also provides specific data that fossils generally do not, such as their color and three-dimensional structure.
 According to experts, this animal has a brown plumage in the upper part and a pale or carotenoid tone in the lower part.
 The discovery also helps to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Since dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed rachis, but do have other feather traits (barbs and barbules), the researchers concluded that the rachis is likely the result of an evolutionary development of these other traits.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate temperature or as an indicator of it. The researchers maintain that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample analyzed presents features of the plumage of an adult and not of a chick.
 The experts' assessments were that, although it is the tail of a dinosaur of short age, the sample illustrates more the plumage of an adult than that of a chick.
 In the morning of yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty others.
 The government said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said the suspect in the attack is a suspected Daish (ELIL) militant.
 The sun was found to be governed by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors driving its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of the light and the rotation are combined to calculate the Rossby number of a star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in relation to its magnetic reversals.
 Iwasaki encountered numerous problems during his voyage.
 He was robbed by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from marriage in Nepal and was arrested by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will make it possible to be compatible with previous versions of 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, as long as the base station has dual radios.
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical performance of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two adult children, did not make a good impression on Miller, who was the one he told the story to.
 Asked for comment, Miller said: "Mike talks a lot during the hearing... I was getting ready, so I really couldn't hear what he was saying."
 “We will work hard to reduce the level of carbon dioxide emitted per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference is significant compared with 2005,” Hu said.
 He did not mention a figure for the cuts and said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu encouraged developing states to “not return to the traditional path of polluting first and cleaning up later.”
 He added: “It is not right to demand that they assume obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their level of responsibility and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Study Group raised its report at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any Iraqi action at this point will halt sectarian fighting, growing violence or a slide toward chaos.
 The report begins with a call for open debate and consensus-building in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the current policy of the executive branch in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 It contains 78 recommendations, the first of which is the adoption of a new initiative before the end of the year with the purpose of protecting Iraq's borders from hostile operations and to restore diplomatic ties with its neighbors.
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who is currently a senator and is the first lady of Argentina, announced last night in La Plata, a city 50 kilometers (31 miles) south of Buenos Aires, that she will run for president.
 The Teatro Argentino was the place where Mrs. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president; this is the same place where she started her campaign for the Senate in 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The issue that sparked the debate was the controversy over the budget for the relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, a measure that some fiscal conservatives jokingly labeled the “Bush New Orleans Agreement.”
 Criticism of the restoration work by liberals focuses on the fact that contracts for reconstruction have been awarded to people who appear to be Washington insiders.
 More than four million individuals gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 So many people gathered that not everyone could get into the funeral at St. Peter's Square.
 Large television screens were set up in different parts of Rome so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities, as well as all over the world, in particular in Poland, similar montages were carried out that saw many people.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies of concentrating its resources on easy-to-solve cases, especially car thefts, in order to improve its success rate.
 In fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and instructed the FBI to assign 10 agents to deal with adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest in the innings: 70 runs with only 41 balls, hitting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they managed a century partnership.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India could only score 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were knocked down to finish the overs.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore early on November 16, kicking off a seven-day tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with the head of state, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush addressed the audience on commercial expansion in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, Prime Minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee for review involving all parties before second reading, and after the 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with NDP leader Jack Layton.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be made to the Conservative environmental law, appealing to a «comprehensive and complete revision of its wording».
 Since the federal government intervened and took over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some members of the federal parliament have denounced this move as a ploy in the run-up to the federal elections in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard said the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital from degradation by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an extra 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest report, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami and some activity of this phenomenon was detected near Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries have been reported in Tonga, but the power supply was temporarily disrupted, which is thought to have prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools on the Big Island or in the vicinity closed completely on Wednesday, despite the warnings.
 George W. Bush, president of the United States, welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the North Korean commitment "an important step forward toward the goal of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Today, a tenth storm of its hurricane season was named, which was called Subtropical Storm Jerry.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said it was now expected that Jerry would make landfall.
 According to estimates by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers, up to 6 inches of rain could seep through the previously damaged levees.
 Because of the overflow of the levee that is near the Ninth Ward, water is now up to the waist in that area, which had already suffered floods of up to 20 feet from Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over the dam in a section that is 100 feet wide.
 Adam Cuerden, Commons administrator, expressed his frustration with deletions in a statement he made to Wikinwes last month.
 “In essence, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning, pretending to be acting on legal grounds, while at the same time pretending to listen to us until the moment he removed the artistic content.”
 The community's outrage led to current efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of open-licensed media.
 Although it was an eminently theoretical work, the program was drafted with the purpose of simulating the observations made to the Sagittarius galaxy.
 It would be the tidal forces between the dark matter in the galaxy and that in the Milky Way that would cause the effect expected by the group of scientists.
 The Milky Way influences the Sagittarius Galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a force of attraction on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts concluded that dark matter interacts with itself in the same way that regular matter does.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter that surrounds a galaxy is located in a kind of halo around it and is made up of numerous small particles.
 On television coverage, white smoke can be seen emanating from the plant.
 The local government warns those who live near the plant not to leave their homes, keep air conditioners off and not to drink tap water.
 According to Japan's nuclear agency, radioactive cesium and iodine have been found in the plant.
 According to speculations of the authorities, everything indicates that the containers of the place that have fuel of uranium could have broken and have losses.
 Extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) was first detected by Dr. Tony Moll in the South African area of Zululand.
 During an interview, he said that the new variant was generating «much concern and alarm, given its high mortality rate».
 Dr. Moll believes that some patients may have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health workers at that hospital.
 In one year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he has had close contact.
 Still, the percentage of XDR-TB in the total TB patient group appears to be low: 6000 out of a total of 333 000 individuals infected at a particular time in South Africa.
 The satellites, which weighed more than 1,000 pounds and traveled at about 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above Earth.
 According to experts, the explosion that generated the collision was massive.
 They are still trying to establish how important the impact was and how it will affect the planet.
 The U.S. Strategic Command, which is part of the Defense Department, is conducting a search for the remains.
 The results of the tracing analysis will be made available on a free access website.
 Ohio authorities said a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be charged with aggravated murder after his mother's body was found in the trunk of his car on Wednesday.
 Dr. Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb located about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, lying on the ground next to the road, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, and apparently in an overdose.
 He guided the officers to his black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There they discovered the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, covered with blood-stained blankets.
 Police said the body appeared to have been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded in late July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led Indian authorities to take measures such as deploying pig hunters, distributing thousands of mosquito nets to the population and using pesticides in the worst-hit areas.
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million doses of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow health companies to prepare for next year.
 This year, the scarcity of monetary resources and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish Post Office and there he became Chief engraver.
 The number of stamps he has made, both for Sweden and for 28 other nations, exceeds 1,000 units.
 The quality and level of detail of his work is so well recognized that he has become one of the few "household names" among philatelists, with people specializing in collecting his work.
 Included in the Guinness Book of World Records, his 1,000th stamp was the formidable «Memorable Achievements of the Swedish Kings» (David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, 2000).
 In addition, he participated in the engraving of banknotes for many states, the most recent examples of his work being the portraits of the Prime Minister visible on the obverse of the new Canadian $5 and $100 bills.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The 64-year-old driver of the truck escaped unhurt.
 The vehicle was removed from the scene around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 An employee of a garage near the scene of the accident said: "There were children waiting to cross the street, and they were all screaming and crying."
 Everyone ran back from the accident site.
 Other issues on the agenda in Bali are saving the forests that remain on the planet and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund to assist countries affected by the effects of global warming, in order to be able to face its impact.
 The funds could be used to build non-flood-prone homes, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that efforts by some to silence women who speak out about the health of these women did not prosper.
 He concluded this based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptive medications be considered a health care need.
 After the fighting had ceased, and the wounded had been taken to hospital, about 40 of the remaining prisoners remained in the yard, refusing to go to their cells.
 Although negotiators tried to defuse the situation, the prisoners' demands are confused.
 The inmates set fire to the prison yard between 10:00 p.m. and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Quickly, agents armed with anti-riot equipment entered the yard and shot down the inmates with tear gas.
 Firefighters were able to extinguish the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, seasonal flooding that left sediment along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which in turn functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have become extinct and two more are in danger of extinction, including the gila cypha.
 While the water level will only rise a few feet past the flood, officials expect it to reach to replenish the eroded sandbanks downstream.
 No tsunami warning has been issued nor will be issued as the earthquake did not reach the 6.5 magnitude required for such a warning.
 Even though there was no threat of a tsunami, residents began to panic and leave their businesses and homes.
 While Winfrey cried on her farewell, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell; it is only the end of one chapter and the beginning of another."
 The comfortable re-election of incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was confirmed by the final results of Namibia's parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO), also won the majority of votes in the legislative elections.
 Coalition and Afghan troops have moved into the area to secure the site and other coalition aircraft have been sent to assist.
 The accident took place high up in mountainous terrain and is thought to have been caused by hostile fire.
 Efforts to find the crash site have to contend with bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The Mangola charity, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization have described it as the worst outbreak recorded in the country.
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Richard Veerman, said: "Angola is heading for the worst outbreak it has ever faced and the situation remains very serious."
 The start of the games was at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a light rain in the middle of the morning that soon dissipated, it was an ideal day for 7s rugby.
 South Africa, the top seed in the tournament, got off to a good start with a 26-0 win over Zambia, who are fifth.
 Although they were outplayed by their southern sisters, South Africa improved as the tournament progressed.
 Their disciplined defense, ball handling skills and excellent teamwork led them to stand out and it was clear that this was the team to beat.
 The authorities in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with a fungus that is dangerous to public health because it is in danger of falling.
 His felling had been scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court order.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the "Seven Sisters", is at least 100 m to 250 m (328 to 820 feet).
 As the infrared images emerge, the temperature variations during the day and night indicate that they are probably caves.
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surrounding surface and, at night, higher.
 “While its thermal behavior is not as regular as the large caves on our planet, which tend to maintain a fairly stable temperature, it is consistent with these deep subsurface cavities,” said Glen Cushing, of the USGS and Northern Arizona University, Flagstaff, Arizona.
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech affair: voters seal themselves in a booth and drop a pre-printed ballot into a box indicating the candidate they have chosen.
 After officials verify the identity of the voter, the voter inserts the ballot into the ballot box and signs the voter list.
 French electoral law establishes the procedures quite strictly.
 Since 1988, the ballot boxes have to be transparent, allowing voters and observers to verify that there are no extra ballots at the beginning of the vote and that no others are added than those of those who vote, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates are allowed to send representatives to monitor each stage of the process and, overnight, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and in accordance with specific procedures.
 ASUS Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality advantages, became the subject of heated debates at the Taipei Information Technology Month 2007.
 But the market for notebook consumers drastically changed after ASUS received the Taiwan Sustainable Development Award 2007 from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China.
 The station's website describes the show as "an old-school radio drama with a smart, new and offensive twist!"
 In its beginnings, the program was only broadcast on the internet radio station, TogiNet Radio, a long-time space focused on the spoken radio format.
 In late 2015, TogiNet installed the AstroNet Radio station as a branch.
 Originally, the show featured amateur voice actors, local to East Texas.
 Widespread looting was reported to have continued throughout the night, as there was no police presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 One observer described Bishkek as sinking into a state of “anarchy” as groups of people roamed the streets and looted shops selling consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the southern protesters for the unrest.
 South Africa defeated New Zealand's All Blacks in a rugby match of the Tri Nations, at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium, in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21-20, ending the All Blacks' 15-match winning streak.
 For the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive defeats.
 It was the last match for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks ago.
 The final of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a clash between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook western Montana at 10:08 p.m. Monday.
 Neither the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) nor its National Earthquake Information Center has reported any direct damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was located about 20 km (15 mi) northeast of Dillon and almost 65 km (40 mi) south of Butte.
 The deadly avian flu strain in humans, H5N1, has struck a wild duck that died, which was found Monday in a marsh near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is in seventh place among the European Union members affected by the virus, behind Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The suspected cases of H5N5 in Croatia and Denmark have not yet been confirmed.
 Chambers's claim against God was based on "the death, destruction, and terror of millions and millions of people on the planet."
 Agnostic Chambers claims that his claim “has no merit” and that “anyone can sue anyone”.
 The story told by the French opera presented by Camille Saint-Saens is that of an artist «whose life is prescribed by love, drugs and Japan».
 As a result, artists smoke cannabis cigarettes on stage and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann, R-Minn., were fourth, fifth and sixth, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched harsh words against Rommey, whose campaign ads against Gingrich were aired in Iowa.
 Perry said: "I will be back in Texas to assess the results of tonight's election and determine whether there is a path forward for me as president." He then said he would remain in the race and compete in the January 21 primary in South Carolina.
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 According to reports, he was in his twenties. Bieber said in a statement: "While I was not present nor directly involved in this terrible accident, my thoughts and prayers are with the victim's family."
 According to the entertainment news website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the Sepulveda Boulevard on the opposite side of the road and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California Highway Patrol officer conducting the vehicle stop to twice order him to cross back over.
 According to police officials, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, there are several countries that have not managed to reach the podium of medals.
 Included are the Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday placed ninth in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, from Australia, placed 11th in the men's super-G slalom standing category, while Czech competitor Oldrich Jelinek finished 16th in the men's sitting category.
 Arly Velásquez, of Mexico, placed 15th in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall, of New Zealand, finished in ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The visually impaired male skier, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in 13th place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of South Korea was 24th in the men's sitting event.
 After the earthquake in 2010, UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti and are blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were recorded near their troops' camp.
 According to the demand, the waste of the UN camp was not sanitized correctly, which caused the entry of bacteria into the Artibonite River, one of the most flowing rivers in Haiti.
 Prior to the arrival of peacekeepers, Haiti had not faced disease-related problems since the 19th century.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent tests that point to the UN peacekeeping battalion from Nepal as the one that involuntarily introduced the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne, a disease expert who works for the UN, it is likely that the outbreak was caused by the peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where there have been some cases of Ebola.
 The hospital has followed infection control protocol, including keeping the patient away from others to prevent possible infections.
 Prior to The Simpsons, Simon had several jobs in other television shows, in various positions.
 In the 80s, he collaborated in several programs, for example, Taxi, Cheers and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he helped create The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for hiring the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive tens of millions of dollars in royalties season after season.
 Earlier, China's official Xinhua news agency reported the hijacking of an aircraft.
 According to subsequent reports, the aircraft received a bomb threat and was diverted back to Afghanistan, where it landed in Kandahar.
 Preliminary reports indicate that the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after being denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumchi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an ageing fleet that is poorly maintained, whether for civilian or military operations.
 International sanctions have resulted in the inability to acquire new aircraft.
 Three people died and three others were injured in a police helicopter accident earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst air disasters in years when a passenger plane bound for Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overran a runway in Mashhad and collided with a wall, leaving 17 dead.
 Aerosmith canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour the U.S. and Canada, which was to end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation of the tour was the injury that suffered the singer Steven Tyler when he fell from the stage during one of his presentations on August 5.
 After both players held all the service games in the set, Murray lost the first one by sudden death.
 Although Del Potro held an initial advantage in the second set, this too was subject to a tiebreak after reaching 6-6.
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but he managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p. m. local time (15:00 UTC).
 Renowned national singers performed bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 Singer Sanju Sharma inaugurated the event and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary. He also performed the chhappan bhog bhajan, along with singer Raju Khandelwal.
 After that, Lakkha Singh took over to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog, which in Hindu religion consists of 56 different edible items, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, that are served as an offering to the god.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh performed the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandekwak.
 On Thursday, at the opening presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, unveiled the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution console launched by the company.
 Similar to a remote control for a television, this control is equipped with two sensors located near the user's television, enabling triangulation of its position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in video games, through the movement of the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella was unable to keep control of the car and retired shortly after the start.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, led for most of the race, but had to put an end to it just after his pit stop, most likely because his right front wheel was badly bent.
 Michael Schumacher retired from the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure, the result of the numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference, he said, "She was very beautiful and, in addition, she sang quite well."
 Every time we did a rehearsal of this, it moved me to the very depths of my soul.
 About 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside the shuttle showed numerous pieces of insulation foam falling off the external fuel tank.
 In any case, it is believed that they have not caused any damage to the shuttle.
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., the NASA shuttle program manager, said the foam fell "after the time of concern."
 Five minutes into the show, a wind kicked up that, about a minute later, was blowing at 70 kilometres per hour (...) Then the rain came, but so hard and so dense that it pierced your skin like a needle. Then hail fell from the sky; people, terrified, screamed and ran over each other.
 “I lost my sister and her friend, and on the way back I saw two people in wheelchairs and everyone was jumping over them and pushing them,” Armand Versace said.
 In addition, NHK said that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co said the quake caused no incidents and that it shut down reactors 1 and 2 at its Shika nuclear plant.
 It was reported that about 9,400 homes in the region are without water supply and about 100 without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor's office.
 Three other bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government buildings in a two-hour span.
 While there are reports that the official death toll is eight and the authorities have confirmed that nearly 30 people were injured, the official figures are still unknown.
 Concentrations of cyanuric acid and melamine were found in urine samples of animals that died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 Experts detected the formation of crystals in the urine of cats, due to the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 When compared using infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), it was determined that the composition of the crystals coincides with that found in the urine of affected pets.
 I don't know if you've noticed or not, but most of the products coming from Central America were arriving in this country free of taxes.
 Yet, the Central American countries taxed eighty percent of the products we made and sold to them.
 I thought that was nonsense; it was definitely not fair.
 All I say to people is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 A bill was dictated by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, that does not allow to sell or rent violent video games to minors.
 The bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a sticker that reads "18" and penalizes their sale to minors with a $1,000 fine for each violation.
 The Director of the Crown Prosecution Service, Kier Starmer QC, made a statement this morning informing that Huhne and Pryce would be put on trial.
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet, with Norman Lamb MP expected to take over the business ministerial role vacated by Davey.
 February 16 is the date Huhne and Pryce are scheduled to appear before Westminster Magistrates' Court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback, aged 25 and 21 respectively, died. The latter was driving.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 Uka's gun jammed as he aimed at the head of a fifth man. Schneider suffers permanent pain, cannot see with one eye, has a part of his skull missing and his face had to be rebuilt with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U.S. Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the competition of Wednesday.
 The first was the slalom, in which he obtained a «Did Not Finish the First Run», as did 36 of the 116 participants in that race.
 In her other race, the giant slalom, she placed tenth in the women's sitting group with a combined time of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 minutes behind the first-place Austrian, Claudia Loesch, and 1:09.02 minutes behind the ninth-place finisher, Gyöngyi Dani, of Hungary.
 Four category skiers sitting out failed to complete their races and a total of 45 participants of 117 in the Giant Slalom failed to make the cut.
 The Madhya Pradesh police were able to recover the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 Assistant Inspector General D.K. Arya said: "We have arrested five individuals who misbehaved with the Swiss woman and recovered her mobile phone and laptop."
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza and Vishnu Kanjar are the accused.
 According to the superintendent of the police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared before the court with their faces covered.
 Although there were three people inside the house at the time of the car impact, none of them suffered injuries.
 However, the driver suffered serious injuries to his head.
 The road where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services removed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh Sheriff Court, charged with the murder of her son.
 While she is in custody awaiting charges and trial, any statement by an eyewitness may be questionable, as her image has been widely disseminated.
 It is common practice in other parts of the UK, but as Scottish justice works differently, the courts considered the publication of the photographs to be potentially damaging.
 Pamela Ferguson, a lecturer at the University of Dundee, said: "It seems that journalists are treading on dangerous ground when they publish pictures or other information about suspects.
 The Crown Office, which handles prosecutions, told reporters it would make no further comment at least until the indictment is issued.
 According to the information that leaked, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to resolve based on the boundaries in force prior to the 1967 Middle East War.
 Other topics that were also reportedly addressed include the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider holy, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a constant military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while the PA only accepts five.
 During the complementary pest control trial, rangers had to closely supervise the shooters, as they were monitored and their effectiveness evaluated.
 In a partnership between NPWS and the New South Wales Association of Sporting Shooters Inc., suitable volunteers were recruited from the Association's hunting program.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge, provisionally, of the Conservation and Heritage Office of the NPWS, said that there was a comprehensive training in safety and training for the four shooters chosen for the shooting operation.
 Yesterday, Martelly was sworn in to a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 In four years, it is the fifth CEP of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential commission advised the previous CEP to resign, as part of a series of measures aimed at leading the country to new elections.
 The commission was the way in which Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The demonstrations, sometimes violent, were provoked by the fact that elections have not been held, in some cases since 2011.
 Nearly 60 cases of iPods with problems of operation and excessive heating have been reported, which caused six fires and minor burns to four people.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) reported 27 accidents involving these devices.
 Last week, METI announced that Apple had reported 34 additional overheating incidents, which the company categorized as “non-serious.”
 The ministry commented on the delay in the Apple report, saying it was something «truly regrettable».
 Mariana was shaken by a quake at 7:19 a.m. local time (21:19 GMT) on Friday.
 The Northern Marianas Emergency Management Agency said there were no reports of damage in the territory.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also reported no tsunami indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police officer hijacked a bus and held hostage tourists who came from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued and at least six have been confirmed dead.
 Both the six hostages, among them children and elderly people, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 Later, photographers took the place of an elderly woman who needed to go to the bathroom, and Mendoza was gunned down.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and began studying medicine.
 She trained in obstetrics and began working at Auckland's National Women's Hospital around 1959.
 Liggins began her research on premature birth in her spare time, while working at the hospital.
 His study showed that the fetal lung maturation of the baby could be accelerated through the administration of a hormone.
 Xinhua reported that on Wednesday government investigators were able to retrieve the flight recorders from the black box.
 Luna's comrades also paid tribute to him.
 Tommy Dreamer said: «Luna was the first queen of the Extreme. She died on the night of the two moons, something unique, like her. A strong woman».
 Dustin Oro en Polvo Runnels stated: «Luna was as rare as I was; even more so. I love her and I will miss her. I hope she is in a better place.»
 Since 2008, among the 1,400 surveyed prior to the 2010 federal election, there was an 8% increase in those opposed to Australia becoming a republic.
 Julia Gillard, the acting prime minister, said during the 2010 federal election campaign that she believed Australia should become a republic once the reign of Queen Elizabeth II ended.
 34% of respondents share this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last queen to have Australia.
 At one end of the survey is 29% of people who think Australia should become a republic as soon as possible; at the other, 31% who think it should never happen.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to swim the 100m and 200m freestyle and three relays at the Commonwealth Games, but his fitness has been called into question following his complaints.
 He has not been able to take painkillers to ease the pain, because they are banned from the Games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number known.
 Many people verified the finding by using various types of hardware and software and it was made public on Tuesday.
 Comets may have served as a source of water and organic matter for our planet, which has the ability to form proteins and sustain life.
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular ours, given that comets crashed into the Earth a long time ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office at the start of the year and last month signed a bill allowing same-sex couples to marry.
 He called the rumors «political chatter and nonsense.»
 He is speculated to run for the 2016 presidential election.
 NextGen is a system that the Federal Aviation Administration says will reduce the distances of air routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel per year and reducing carbon emissions.
 It employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old ground-based radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft more accurately and provide more accurate data to pilots.
 No additional transportation will be implemented and trains will not stop at Wembley. Parking for cars and deterrent will not be available.
 Due to the concern generated by the possible lack of transportation, the possibility of the game being played behind closed doors, without the fans of the team, was considered.
 On Thursday, the journal Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Experts from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have reported that the new species evolved in just two generations, despite the fact that it was thought to take much longer, due to the reproduction between an endemic Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take on all kinds of shapes and curl into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets, but it can also be stretched to a very thin wire that can be twisted and braided.
 It can be made very thin and adhered to another metal. It is so thin that it was used to decorate the illustrations made by hand in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH of a chemical. You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the cabbage juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic (alkaline) the chemical substance is.
 The number of hydrogen ions (the H in pH) present in the chemical being tested determines its pH level.
 Hydrogen atoms are made up of a proton and an electron, so a hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton from its electron.
 Stir both dry powders together and, after doing so, with clean and wet hands, squeeze them to form a ball.
 A reaction will occur between the moisture in your hands and your outer layers, which will feel strange to the touch and form a kind of shell.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had flush toilets in almost every house, which were connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, Greece, traces of sewer systems have been found.
 Toilets also existed in ancient Egypt, Persia and China. In Roman civilization, public baths had toilets and some were shared by men and women.
 When one communicates with someone who is thousands of miles away, one is using a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it back almost instantly.
 The satellite was sent into space by a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space because the light from Earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light we see.
 A giant rocket, more than 100 feet tall, is needed to get a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has changed the world in surprising ways. The most relevant thing it has done for us is to provide us with much simpler and faster transportation.
 Thanks to it we have many means of transportation, such as the railroad or the automobile, among many others.
 Below, there are more moderate sized felines that feed on medium sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines (including independent domestic cats) that feed on species of small size that exist in much greater quantity, such as insects, rodents, lizards and birds.
 The secret of their success is the concept of niche: each feline has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of the felines and their lives are spent in large groups called prides.
 The herds are formed by one to three adult males of the same family group, joined with up to thirty females and their offspring.
 Generally, females are closely related to each other, making them a large family of sisters and daughters.
 Lion prides behave like those of wolves or dogs, with whom they share a surprising similarity (unlike other big cats) in both their behavior and in being highly lethal to their prey.
 An all-round athlete, the tiger has the ability to climb (but not very well), swim, jump long distances and pull five times as hard as a robust human.
 The tiger is in the same genus (Panthera) as lions, leopards and jaguars. These are the only four felines capable of roaring.
 The tiger's roar is not a fully sonorous roar like that of the lion, but rather a prayer of words spoken in growls and screams.
 Ocelots enjoy feeding on small creatures. If possible, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents and birds. Almost all of their prey will be much smaller than they are.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat (prey) through smell, smelling the ground where they have passed.
 They have very good night vision and in dark places, and in addition, they move very silently. Ocelots hunt their prey by mimicking their surroundings and then pounce on them.
 When a small group of living things (a small population) moves away from the main group they came from (for example, if they move to a mountain range or a river, or if they move to a new island so they can't easily move back) they will often find themselves in a different environment than they were used to.
 The new environment has different resources and competitors, and therefore a new population will need different characteristics or adaptations than it had before to be a strong competitor.
 There have been no changes in the original population, which still needs the same adaptations as in the past.
 As time passes, as the incipient population adapts to the new environment, it begins to resemble the other population less and less.
 Eventually, after thousands or even millions of years, the two populations will look so different that they will not be classified as the same species.
 This process is called speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an inevitable consequence and a fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that they exhale (that they expel).
 The food of the plants is generated with the solar energy, thanks to the photosynthesis. Besides, they offer us shade.
 We build our houses from plants and with them we also make clothes. Most of the food we eat is plants. Without them, animals would not survive.
 The Mosasaurus was the alpha predator of its time, so it feared nothing, except other members of its own species.
 Its long jaws had more than 70 razor-sharp teeth embedded in them, plus an additional set in the palate, which meant that anything that came in front of it had no escape.
 We don't know for sure, but it could have had venom. Its diet included turtles, large fish, other mosasaurs, and even could have been a cannibal.
 He also attacked any creature that entered the water: not even a dinosaur as huge as the T. Rex was a threat to him.
 While most of that food would be quite familiar to us, the Romans also ate some rather unconventional items at banquets, such as wild boar, peacocks, snails, and even a type of rodent, the hare.
 Another thing that differentiated them was that the humble people and women ate sitting on a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and throwing themselves sideways while eating.
 It is not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 For example, they had no maize, tomatoes, potatoes, or cacao, and no Roman ever tasted a turkey.
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered their home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods and priests sought to satisfy the needs of those by performing ceremonies and festivals.
 The temples had an open courtyard and then an inner sanctuary to which only priests could enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of the temples.
 The upper part of the tower was a special sanctuary for their deity.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not of major importance.
 Hebrew families spent most of their time outdoors.
 Women cooked in the yard; the shops were just showcases that gave onto the street. Houses were built of stone.
 There were no large forests in the land of Canaan, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland. According to the Norse sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and, during a voyage he undertook further west, he discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Even so, despite their discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already inhabiting the place by then.
 While each country was individually "Scandinavian", there were marked differences in the people, monarchs, customs and history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 However, that is not true. While the reverse of the document does contain something written, it is not a map to a treasure.
 The Declaration of Independence is written on the back of the document, with the text facing downwards.
 Although it is not known for certain who drafted it, it is known that the enormous parchment document (measuring 29¾ inches by 24½ inches) was rolled up for safekeeping.
 Therefore, it is likely that the annotation was added only as a label.
 While the landings carried out during D-Day, as well as subsequent engagements, had achieved the liberation of northern France, the south remained.
 Its government was in the hands of the French of Vichy, who were a group that in 1940 had agreed to peace with the Germans and worked with the invaders instead of fighting against them.
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called «Operation Dragon» was deployed, through which the Allies invaded southern France.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces had liberated southern France and were moving on to Germany.
 A civilization can be defined as a specific culture that is shared by a large group of people who live and work together; that is, a society.
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and is related to both the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, and civitas, which means city or city state and which, in addition, determines in some way the size of the society.
 The city-states are the precursors of nations. A civilization culture entails a long generational transmission of knowledge, a lasting cultural legacy and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures tend to disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and fail to be recognized as civilizations in their own right.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen states formed, at first, a weak central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which the Congress was its only component.
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and since there was a national executive or judiciary, that power was left to the state authorities, who often failed to enforce all the laws.
 Nor was he empowered to annul tax laws or tariffs between states.
 The articles required the unanimous approval of all states to proceed to their amendment and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German team, is the second most successful team in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the sports that are practiced the most are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern areas, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 Japan has about 7,000 islands (the largest is Honshu), making it the seventh largest archipelago in the world.
 Due to the conglomerate/group of islands it contains, Japan is often referred to as an "archipelago" from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the 15th century, when European sailors who sailed the area recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, that is, beautiful island.
 The establishment, in 1624, by the Dutch East India Company, of a base in southwest Taiwan, initiated a transformation in the aboriginal method of grain production, with the use of Chinese labour to work on their rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) army took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan a province of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the First Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government adheres to the Treaty of Shimonoseki, through which it cedes sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which maintains its control over the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu has three main constructions: Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 Most of the buildings at the ends of the complex have been reconstructed so that tourists can see what they looked like originally.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had already been restored and work continues to this day.
 To exemplify, the most common format of still image photography globally is 35 mm, which was the most used film size towards the end of the analogue film era.
 Today it is still produced, but the most important thing is that its dimensional relationship was transferred to the image sensor formats of digital cameras.
 In fact, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, as its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 This is why the dimensional relationship of this format (dividing by twelve to calculate the simplest integer ratio) is said to be 3:2.
 Many typical formats (for example, the APS group) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds, which has been the subject of constant mockery and has often been ridiculed, is a simple guideline that generates dynamism while allowing some order to be given to images.
 The most effective position for the central object is the intersection of the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds (see example).
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had accumulated wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had united the European states despite their different languages and customs.
 Its power, present everywhere, affected everyone, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that church funds are reserved for that specific purpose.
 The central dome of the church had remained in Rome for more than a millennium and this concentration of power and money made many wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 While the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, it violated generally recognized international law and several international agreements of the past two centuries.
 Britain drew international waters in complete sectors of the ocean to block the entry of ships, even putting at risk neutral ships.
 Having received a reduced response to this tactic, Germany thought it would encounter a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Throughout the 1920s, the attitude of most citizens and nations was one of pacifism and isolation.
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of World War I, countries wanted to avoid a repeat of that in the future.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the U.S. to take a job with the Edison Company in New York.
 He arrived in the U.S. with 4 cents, a book of poems and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor (his manager at his last job) addressed to Thomas Edison.
 Ancient China had a unique way of delimiting the different periods of time. Each stage or each family in power constituted a different dynasty.
 Between each dynasty, there was also a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war broke out between many nobles who were disputing the throne.
 One of the bloodiest periods in the history of Ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great palace in Xi'an.
 There are many political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the shift from absolutism to republicanism, nationalism, and the belief that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 Also, after the Revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the success of the most ambitious and prestigious.
 The same is true of the military, which instead of basing army ranks on classes, now bases them on caliber.
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other people of the repressed working class of other countries to face their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this worldly life. He used to visit a cave that became known as Hira on the mountain of Noor (light) to reflect.
 The cave itself, which has endured the test of time, illustrates in a very realistic way the spiritual inclinations of Muhammad.
 At the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, lies a cave totally cut off from the rest of the planet.
 Indeed, it is very difficult to find, even if one is sure of its existence. Inside the cave, the isolation is total.
 Nothing can be seen but the marvellous clear sky and the numerous mountains in the surrounding area. From the inside of this cave, very little of this world can be seen or heard.
 Of the seven wonders, the only one that still stands is the Great Pyramid of Giza.
 The Great Pyramid, built by the Egyptian people in the 3rd century BC, is one of many large pyramid-shaped structures built to honor the deceased pharaoh.
 The Giza Plateau, or Giza Necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings, in Egypt, contains numerous pyramids (of which the Great Pyramid is the largest), several smaller tombs, temples, and the Great Sphinx.
 The Great Pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Khufu, and many other pyramids, tombs and smaller temples were built in honor of his wives and family.
 The "upward bow" mark resembles a V and the "downward bow" mark is similar to a staple or a square without its bottom edge.
 Up means that you should start at the tip and push the bow, and down means that you should start at the heel, where the hand holds the bow, and pull it.
 The upward movement of the bow generates a softer sound, while a downward movement is stronger and more abrupt.
 Feel free to make your own marks with pencil, but please remember that the marks on the bow instruments have been printed there for a musical purpose and should therefore be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of women from the market forced the terrified monarch Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette, their two young children (Marie Therese, eleven years old and Louis Charles, four years old) and the king's sister, Madam Elizabeth, to return to Paris from Versailles.
 They traveled back to Paris in a carriage surrounded by a mob shouting and throwing threats at the king and queen.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At one point, a participant in the revolt shook the head of a royal guard executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in a panic.
 The Filipino people themselves paid the costs of the U.S. imperialist war of conquest in the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover most of the costs and interest on bonds that were floated in the name of the Philippine government in Wall Street banks.
 From the outset, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the principal gains of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, it is necessary to understand the context that gave rise to the establishment of the order.
 The European historical period in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (i.e. between the years 1000 and 1300 AD).
 The High Middle Ages was preceded by the Early Middle Ages and followed by the Late Middle Ages which, by convention, ends around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a concept that encompasses, pragmatically, a wide range of ideas, from the impulse or imperative of technology to a strict sense of there being an underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence and that, at the same time, technology has “effects” on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 To take an example, one might argue that the existence of automobiles necessarily leads to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not economically viable for a small number of cars, so new manufacturing techniques are being developed to reduce the cost of owning a vehicle.
 The mass use of automobiles also generates a higher incidence of traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very present in Romanticism, according to scholars such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography shaped people and, over time, customs and cultures related to that geography developed that, being in harmony with the location of that society, were preferable to laws that were imposed arbitrarily.
 Just as Paris is known as the city of fashion today, Constantinople was considered as such in feudal Europe.
 Its fame as a center of luxury began around 400 B.C. and extended to about 1100 A.D.
 During the twelfth century its status declined, mainly because the crusaders brought back gifts such as silks and spices, which were valued more highly than the goods offered in the Byzantine markets.
 The title of "capital of fashion" was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The peak of the Gothic style took place in the period between the 10th-11th and 14th centuries.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from the Byzantine culture in the east.
 However, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could take a delay of 25 to 30 years.
 By the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the most significant advances of that era was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their garments.
 Subsistence agriculture is understood as that whose objective is to produce enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his family group exclusively.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, generally organic practice that combines the use of regionally indigenous stored seeds with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, much of the main activity of farmers was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginalization from social standards and provide them with the opportunity to generate a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures: age, ethnicity, class, location or gender of its members.
 The traits that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion or politics, or a mixture of factors.
 It is common for members of a subculture to exhibit traits of their membership by recurring to distinctive and symbolic use of style, such as fashions, gestures, and jargon.
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socializing is to analyze the few and lamentable cases of children who, through neglect, misfortune or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called “feral children”. Some feral children are confined by people, usually their parents. In some cases, the abandonment of a child is due to the parents’ rejection of the child’s severe intellectual or physical disability.
 It is possible that the feral children have suffered traumatic situations or severe child abuse before being abandoned or running away.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals and some have lived on their own in the wild.
 When the wild child is raised exclusively by animals other than humans, it presents behaviors (within its physical possibilities) almost identical to those of the specific animal that cared for it, as well as its fear or indifference towards people.
 While project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, scaffolding goes a little further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning technique; it is, rather, a support that provides assistance to those who are experiencing a new experience, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The scaffolding can be presented in both real and virtual format; in other words, a teacher is a type of scaffolding, but so is the animated little paper clip in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual scaffolding is embedded in the software and its function is to question, stimulate or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student alone.
 Children are placed in foster homes for a wide variety of reasons, from neglect to abuse and even extortion.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, care and education; but it happens.
 We can see that the family foster system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, sustained education and reliable medical care.
 The purpose of foster care is to meet all the needs that were not being met in the home from which the child was removed.
 The Internet unites and mixes components of mass communication and between people.
 The different features that the Internet presents open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, "learning" and "socialization" are cited as significant incentives for Internet use (James et al., 1995).
 During a study of user reactions to websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), "personal participation" and "long-term relationships" were also detected as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos, important findings have been made in the interpretation of micro-expressions, which are movements on the face of only a few milliseconds in duration.
 Specifically, it is argued that, through the proper reading of their micro-expressions, it is possible to detect whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article The President's Speech, explained how those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless judge sincerity accurately.
 Even suggests that the skills for interpreting human behavior can be shared with animals, such as domestic dogs.
 Through the research work of the twentieth century it has been demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation: the hidden and the manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation; the process of selection removes it from the set of variations.
 Segregation and recombination shuffle variation from one generation to the next.
 In the savannah, it is not easy for a primate, whose digestive system is the same as that of humans, to satisfy its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources available.
 Not doing so causes serious problems: slowed growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the most readily available source of plant food, but they are not easily digestible for primates like ourselves, unless cooked.
 In contrast, foods derived from animals (ants, termites, eggs) are easy to digest while providing a large number of proteins that contain all the essential amino acids.
 In the end, it should not surprise us if our own ancestors solved their “protein problems” in the same way as the savannah chimpanzees do today.
 Interrupted sleep consists of waking up intentionally during the normal sleep period and falling asleep again after a while (10 to 60 minutes).
 This can be easily achieved with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will bring him back to a conscious state, although without waking him up completely.
 Registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options that are based on the biological rhythm consist in drinking a lot of liquid (especially water or tea, known diuretic) before going to bed, which will force him to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace a person enjoys is inversely related to the amount of tension in his body and in his spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force we have. Each of us has the potential to find absolute peace and happiness.
 We can all reach enlightenment. The only thing that hinders the way is our tension and negativity.
 While the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of Buddha, it has been extended by the Mahayana path of love and numerous yoga techniques from India.
 In general terms, laism is very simple. It is based on kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that encompasses everything.
 In Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (enlightenment) is activated with yoga positions, breathing practices, mantras or visualizations.
 Tibetan meditation focuses on Devata Yoga. Through the visualization of various deities, the energy channels can be cleared, the chakras activated, and the awareness of enlightenment developed.
 The cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during the Second World War. When the war ended, the clashes of system, process and culture ended up distancing the two countries.
 Two years after the end of the war, those who had been allies were now enemies and the Cold War began.
 It would last for the next 40 years and would be fought for real, through substitute militias, on battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Because by September 17, 1939, the Polish defense was already broken, their only hope was to retreat and reorganize in the extension of the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans fell into disuse almost overnight, when more than 800,000 Red Army soldiers of the Soviet Union invaded and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts after invading eastern Poland, violating the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international, bilateral and multilateral agreements.
 Using ships to transport goods is a much more efficient way to move large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The function of the navy has always been to ensure that its country retains the ability to transport its population and goods, while interfering with the enemy's ability to do the same.
 The North Atlantic campaign of World War II provides one of the clearest and most recent examples of this. The Americans were trying to move men and material across the Atlantic to support Britain.
 At the same time, the German navy, using mainly submarines, tried to stop this traffic.
 If the Allies had not been successful, Germany could have taken over Britain, as it did with the other European countries.
 Goats were apparently first domesticated about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 In order to obtain their milk, hair, meat and leather easily, the ancient peoples and tribes began to keep them.
 Domestic goats were usually kept in herds that wandered over hills or other grazing areas, often tended by goat herders who were often children or teenagers, similar to the more popular shepherd. These methods of grazing are still used today.
 In England, railways were already installed by the 16th century.
 Even though the rails of the carts were made of simple parallel wooden planks, they allowed the horses that pulled them to achieve greater speed and to haul heavier loads than on the somewhat more rugged paths of the day.
 The incorporation of sleepers to keep the rails in place occurred quite early. However, gradually, it was realized that the rails would be more efficient if they were coated with iron on their upper part.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear on the wooden wheels of the carriages.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones and, in 1767, solid iron rails began to be used.
 The first form of transportation that was known was walking. The human being began to do it in an upright position two million years ago with the appearance of Homo Erectus (which means upright man).
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not have the habit of walking upright.
 While bipedal traces have been found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, it is possible that Sahelanthropus walked on two legs 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more planet-friendly life, join environmental movements, or even become activists and fight to mitigate, in some way, future suffering.
 It is, in many cases, like the treatment of the asymptomatic. But if we do not seek only a temporary situation, we should find the root of the problems and try to deactivate them.
 It is obvious that the world has undergone great changes, as a result of the technological and scientific advances of mankind, and the problems have intensified because of overpopulation and the extravagant lifestyles of people.
 After being approved by Congress on July 4, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent to the printing press of John Dunlap, a few blocks away.
 Between 150 and 200 copies were made during the night, which are now known as the "Dunlap Copies".
 It was John Nixon who first read the document and he did so in the Independence Hall courtyard on July 8.
 A copy was sent to George Washington on July 6, who ordered it read to his army in New York on July 9. Another copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 photographs by Dunlap, which are known to still exist, are the oldest copies of the document. The original manuscript has been lost.
 A large number of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and is alive today. They are the birds.
 Many people do not picture them as dinosaurs, as they have feathers and can fly.
 However, there are many features in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly limbs and claws, lay eggs and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 Nowadays, almost all computers operate on the basis of the manipulation of data encoded under the binary system.
 A binary number can only have one of two values, they are 0 and 1 and, according to computer jargon, these numbers are known as binary digits, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not be immediately evident. Symptoms, such as vomiting, are too common to be able to make an immediate diagnosis.
 The clearest indicator of internal poisoning may be finding an open bottle of toxic chemical medicines or cleaning products.
 Read the label for specific first aid information for that specific poison.
 Entomologists use the term insect parasite in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its ancient relationship with bedbugs, a species that has evolved to parasitize humans.
 Bed bugs and assassin bugs are nesting; they are adapted to live in the nest or home of their host.
 The number of cases of multiple sclerosis (MS) in the United States is estimated at about 400,000, making it the most common neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system, the junction of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerve, is the target of multiple sclerosis.
 Studies have indicated that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from MS.
 A couple might conclude that raising a baby would not be the most suitable for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan the adoption of a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents relinquish their parental rights so that a different couple can take care of the child.
 The ultimate goal of science is to decipher how the world works through the scientific method, which in fact guides most scientific research.
 It is not, however, an experiment, it is a test that is used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses, asking questions and observations that guide scientific research.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was put on the classical works; especially, the Latin version of the biblical text.
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the dominance of the Greek language waned, the West distanced itself from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Often, many rhythms present in physiological processes and in behavior depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate autonomously and have a free cyclical period of operation, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using phage, or viruses.
 They performed two experiments in which they labeled the phage DNA with radioactive phosphorus or the DNA protein with radioactive sulfur.
 Depending on the type of mutation, the significance of the affected piece of genetic material, and whether it involves germ cells, the mutation can have various effects.
 Only mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while those that occur elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism tends to attract people interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the landscape, which includes wildlife and plant life.
 Some examples of possible activities in the area are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching and visiting parks, and studying ecosystem information.
 An example is visiting, taking photographs and learning about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to work, and they often cross paths with others whose jobs are in the place they have just left.
 In this dynamic transfer shuttle, everyone is somehow connected to and sustained by a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles.
 Scientists now argue that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity for the last two million years.
 Everyone is part of society and makes use of transport systems; and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it is rare to hear similar levels of complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transportation systems give rise to complaints of this magnitude and why do failures occur on a daily basis? Are transportation engineers simply incompetent or is there something more substantial going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and of the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, it is not easy to study traffic flow, as it is not possible to make accurate predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, there is a tendency for drivers to behave relatively consistently, which allows traffic flows to have a logical consistency and can be approximated mathematically.
 In order to more clearly graph the flow of circulation, relationships were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both the planning and design and the operations of the roadway devices.
 The first species to fly were insects. This helped them to escape enemies more easily and to find food and mates more effectively.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back, attaching them to the sides of their bodies.
 This gives them a larger range of possible small places to hide from predators.
 Currently, anisoptera and ephemeroptera are the only insects unable to fold their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the Solar System revolved around the Sun.
 Some shared his theory, but many others believed the opposite: that the solar system orbited the Earth, even the Sun and other stars.
 This seems to make sense, as on Earth we do not perceive its movement, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second-longest river in the world. It contains 8 times more water than the river that comes in second.
 In addition, the Amazon is the widest river in the world, in some places with a width of up to six miles.
 Of the total water flowing from the world's rivers into the oceans, 20 percent comes from the Amazon.
 The great Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 miles) long and receives water from thousands of smaller rivers.
 While stone pyramids continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom, none could surpass those of Giza, neither in size nor in the sublime technique of their construction.
 The ancient Egyptian New Kingdom was awed by the monuments of its forebears, which dated back more than a millennium.
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the smallest in terms of population.
 Italian is used in Vatican City, both for drafting its legislation and for issuing its official communications.
 The language spoken daily by the majority of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens living in Vatican City belong to the Roman Catholic religion.
 Basic chemical elements such as gold, silver and copper have been known since ancient times, as they can be found in their original form in nature and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was more similar to the states of matter (with the same order): solid, liquid, gaseous and plasma, only that, at the same time, he had the theory that they transform into new substances that make up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals. Remember that the periodic table has many elements.
 Metals are considered to be elements such as calcium and potassium. Since then, there are also metals of the type of gold and silver.
 It is also possible that alloys with small amounts of non-metallic elements, such as carbon, exist.
 Everything in the Universe is made of matter, which is composed of tiny particles called atoms.
 The size of atoms is so impressively tiny that the final point of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 So when it was invented, the pencil made many friends.
 Unfortunately, as a result of the implementation of new writing methods, the pen is used less and has lost its status.
 Nowadays, people write messages on the screens of their computers. They don't even need to approach a typewriter.
 It remains to be seen what will happen to the keyboard when something new comes along.
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that energy is required to form a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It is similar to what happens when a heavy car is rolling uphill. By splitting the core once more, it releases some of that energy.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable, meaning that they tend to decay with little or no prompting.
 The surface of the moon is made of rocks and dust and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the highlands.
 It is possible that there are more seas on the near side because its crust is thinner, which made it easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Content theories focus on what it is that attracts or pleases people.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew to maturity.
 These theories analyze what causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment force them to do or not do certain things.
 Two theories of very well known are the hierarchy of needs, of Maslow, and the two factors, of Hertzberg.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues. On one side of the spectrum is the attempt to remain “one of the guys” (or girls).
 Managers in this category have trouble making decisions that are unpopular with employees, imposing disciplinary measures, conducting performance evaluations, assigning responsibilities, and holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, he mutates into an unrecognizable person who believes it necessary to change everything that the group has been doing up to now and do it his way.
 After all, the ultimate responsibility for the success or failure of the team is the leader.
 This way of behaving often ends up distancing the leaders from the other team members.
 The same standards of excellence that apply to conventional teams apply to virtual teams, although there are some minor differences.
 Often, members of a virtual team act as a point of contact for their closest physical group.
 They generally enjoy greater autonomy than members of a traditional group, because their teams can meet according to different time zones, which, for example, might not be understood by the local management.
 The existence of a real «invisible team» (Larson and LaFasto, 1989 p. 109) is also an exclusive element of the virtual teams.
 The “invisible team” is the group in charge of management and to which each member reports. It is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 What motive could an organization have for subjecting itself to the demanding process of establishing a learning organization? One of the purposes of applying the theoretical concepts of organizational learning is to drive innovation.
 When all available resources are used appropriately in the operational departments of an organization, space is created for creativity and ingenuity.
 As a result, the process of an organization working as a team to overcome a difficulty may lead to a new innovative process in order to meet the needs of customers.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first create a culture of innovation, as well as shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous approach as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition. They therefore reduce the field of research and give it greater precision.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 It has long been known that various types of brain damage, trauma, injury and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the rise of new technologies, we have the possibility to see and investigate structures and processes that occur in the brain that have never been seen before.
 This provides us with abundant information and material to develop simulation models, which enhance our understanding of mental processes.
 While it is often associated with science fiction, artificial intelligence is a specialty of great relevance within computer science, which is responsible for the behavior, learning and intelligent adaptation in a machine.
 Research in the field of AI involves the development of machines in order to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of this are, among others, monitoring, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and queries, as well as facial recognition, writing, voice.
 These issues have become separate disciplines, focused on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial Intelligence is now often used in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, as well as being incorporated into various applications of video games and personal computers.
 Study trips are an important part of any classroom. It is common for a teacher to want to take her students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 The solution comes from technology, through virtual tours. Students can observe objects exhibited in a museum, visit an aquarium or contemplate beautiful works of art sitting with their class.
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on an outing and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a web page about their trip to the state capital and each year the page is updated, but the previous versions are kept online as a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing. Although students often start out with poor grammar and spelling, this usually improves as they become aware of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical readers, the blog writer begins to strive to improve his writing in order to avoid criticism.
 Blogging, likewise, “requires students to be more sympathetic to the world around them.” The need to engage the audience inspires them to be smart and interesting (Toto, 2004).
 Blogs are a resource that inspires collaboration and encourages students to delve deeper into their learning beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of blogs «can empower students to be more analytical and critical, through the active response to the contents of the Internet, they can define their positions in the context of the writings of others, in addition to establishing their perspectives on specific topics» (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the charming bilingual capital of Canada and boasts a variety of museums and art galleries that display the country's history and present.
 Niagara Falls is further south, and the north is home to the unspoiled natural beauty of Muskoka and the surrounding area.
 All these aspects, among others, are what make Ontario seem intrinsically Canadian to the eyes of foreigners.
 The large areas further north are sparsely populated and some are wilderness, almost uninhabited.
 To make a population comparison that is a great surprise to many: in the United States live more African Americans than Canadians.
 The location of the East African islands is off the east coast of that continent, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and a continent in itself when it comes to wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent states or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury resorts.
 Islam was also brought to the lands by the Arabs and imposed, to a large extent, in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 The initial point of European influence and colonialism took place in the 15th century, as a result of the discovery, by the Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama, of the route that connects the Cape of Europe with India.
 The region is bounded by the Sahel to the north, and the Atlantic Ocean to the south and west.
 Women: All female visitors are advised to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring (just make sure it doesn't look too expensive).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can cause what they consider harassment, and that it is not uncommon to be followed, taken by the arm, etc.
 Be firm in rejecting men and do not hesitate to defend your position (cultural differences aside, that is not right!).
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the 10th century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans and Merinids used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese under the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 it was abandoned after an earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish merchants who installed their businesses in that place called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in Morocco to go shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where traditional Moroccan items are sold, such as clay pots, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of trinkets, although everything is geared towards tourists.
 Goma is a tourist destination in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the eastern border, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets underwater, especially in the city center.
 While Goma is generally safe, any visit outside the city should be considered in order to be aware of the situation of the ongoing clashes in the province of North Kivu.
 In turn, the city is the base for climbing the Nyiragongo volcano and its mountain gorilla sightseeing excursions are among the most economical in Africa.
 To get around Goma, you can opt for a bodaboda (mototaxi). The regular fare (local) is CDF500 (Congolese francs) for a short trip.
 This, coupled with the fact that it is relatively inaccessible, has given Timbuktu an image of an exotic and remote land.
 Although today Timbuktu is a poor city, it still has an airport and its reputation makes it a tourist attraction.
 In 1990, it was added to the list of places of human heritage at risk, due to the threat of desert sands.
 It was one of the most important stops of Henry Louis Gates's special, Wonders of the African World, on PBS.
 The city contrasts much with the rest of the country, as it has a more Arabic than African style.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa and extends along the Mozambique border to the east, Zimbabwe to the north and the Crocodile River to the south.
 The park has a surface area of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 different ecozones, each of which is home to a different wildlife.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of the South African National Parks (SANParks).
 As in all South African nature reserves, there are daily conservation and park entrance fees.
 It may also be convenient to purchase a Wild Card that allows entry to selections of parks in South Africa or to all National Parks in the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous island, which is the destination most of the tourists consider the main attraction.
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a light bar graph that is evidenced by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront, located in front.
 It is in the recovered lands of the northern coast of Hong Kong where its urban development is concentrated, densely.
 This is the site that the British conquerors adopted as their own, so if you want to see evidence of the colonial past of this region, it is a convenient place to start.
 The Sundarbans are the largest coastal mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 km (50 miles) from the coast into Bangladesh and India.
 UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a World Heritage Site. The forest section within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 Notwithstanding, the forests are not only mangroves, but they also have some of the last trees that remain of the impressive jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3850 km2 and about one third of its extension is covered by water or swampy areas.
 The Sundarbans have been a wildlife sanctuary since 1966 and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 Buses leave the inter-district station (across the river) throughout the day, although most, especially those travelling east and to Jakar (also called Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30.
 Because buses between districts are often crowded, it is recommended to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese Coaster buses, which are comfortable and durable.
 Sharing a taxi is a quick and convenient way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge crossing the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two lanes of 3.5 m wide.
 Under the bridge there is a 15-meter-wide space, and although its construction was completed in August 2011, it was not opened to traffic until March 2017.
 Full operation of the bridge is estimated for September 2017, which is when Brazilian customs controls are expected to end.
 The area that is now eastern Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraní, who were the most important indigenous group in the region and who lived as semi-nomadic hunter-gatherers, as well as practicing subsistence agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other aboriginal groups, for example, the Guaycurú and Payaguá, who hunted, gathered and fished as a means of subsistence.
 Paraguay, formerly known as «The Gigantic Province of the Indies», was born in the 16th century, as a result of the encounter between the Spanish conquerors and the native indigenous peoples.
 The Spanish started the colonization stage, which lasted for three centuries.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been able to preserve much of its aboriginal idiosyncrasy and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best teams and players of polo in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the Las Cañitas polo fields.
 Other tournaments and lower-level matches may also be held at other times of the year.
 The Argentine Polo Association website provides information about tournaments and where to buy tickets for polo matches.
 The value of the Falkland Islands pound (FKP), the official currency of the Falkland Islands, is fixed in equivalence with the British pound (GBP).
 There is a bank on the islands. You can change money there. It is opposite the FIC West shop in Stanley.
 Pounds sterling are generally accepted anywhere within the islands, and in Stanley, credit cards and US dollars are also accepted.
 There is a chance that credit cards will not be accepted on the outer islands, but you may be able to use British or American money. Ask the owners in advance to find out what method of payment they accept.
 It is virtually impossible to change money outside the Falkland Islands, so make sure you do it before you leave.
 Because Montevideo is in the southern hemisphere, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere and vice versa.
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above +30°C during the summer.
 Winter cold can be deceiving: while it is very rare for temperatures to fall below freezing, wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no stations specifically "rainy" or "dry"; the amount of rain remains almost the same throughout the year.
 While many of the park's animals are used to seeing people, wildlife is still wild, so do not feed or harass them.
 According to the parks' authorities, you should keep at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves, and 25 yards/meters away from the rest of the wild animals.
 No matter how docile they may look, bison, wapiti, moose, bears and virtually all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors suffer injuries each year from not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild and potentially dangerous; respect their space.
 Also, remember that smells attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid having or cooking food that gives off a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a nefarious naval confrontation when seven German, American and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all the ships, except a British cruiser. Nearly two hundred Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the independence war that the Mau movement waged, a peaceful meeting in the city ended with the assassination of the head of state, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a large number of beaches, as Auckland has two harbours. The most well-known are in three areas.
 In the North Harbour district, on the Pacific Ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 The beaches are almost all sandy with safe swimming areas and mostly have pohutukawa trees that provide shade.
 In the Waitemataas harbour, the beaches of Tamaki Drive are located in the extravagant Mission Bay and St Heliers neighbourhoods in the central region of Auckland.
 These are family beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing. They are also safe for swimming.
 Number One is the most popular local beer and is not complex, but rather pleasant and refreshing. The other regional beer is Manta.
 While there is a wide variety of French wines, those from New Zealand and Australia could be considered better for transport.
 Local tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you are concerned, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of “flat white” coffee to be foreign. A small, black coffee is called “espresso”, cappuccino is served with cream (rather than foam) and tea is not served with milk.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards. Fruit juices are expensive, but delicious.
 Numerous dives are made to the reef throughout the year and, there, injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 In any case, accept the advice of the authorities, respect all the signs and pay special attention to the security alerts.
 Cubomedusae are found near beaches and river estuaries from October to April, north of 1770, but are sometimes found outside this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they almost never attack people. Most of them are afraid of people and would swim away.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles actively reside. Their primary habitat is the estuaries of the rivers that are located north of Rockhampton.
 Booking accommodation in advance gives you the peace of mind that you will have a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 Travel agents often have agreements with specific hotels, although it is also possible to book other types of accommodation, such as camping areas.
 Travel agents typically offer packages that include breakfast, transfers to and from the airport, and even combined flight and accommodation packages.
 They can also hold the reservation in case you need time to think better the offer, or to obtain other documents for your destination (such as, for example, the visa).
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 At some festivals, most of those attending the music events choose to camp on site and most of the audience consider it a crucial part of the experience.
 If you want to get close to the action, then you should arrive early to the camp to get a good spot near the music events.
 It should be noted that, although the musical performances may have ended, in other areas of the festival could continue until late at night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you are crossing the Baltic Sea in winter, check where the cabin is located, as the ice-breaking noise is very disturbing for those affected.
 During the cruises to St. Petersburg, time is also spent in the city. Those who disembark are exempt from visa requirements (see terms).
 Casinos typically make great efforts to maximize the time and money their customers spend. There are usually no windows or clocks and exits can be hard to find.
 They often offer special food, drink and entertainment promotions in order to keep guests in good spirits and on the premises.
 Some establishments serve free spirits. Although drunkenness affects judgment and every good player knows the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone who intends to drive in high latitudes or mountain passes should plan for the possibility of snow, ice or low temperatures.
 On ice or snow, there is little friction, so it is not possible to drive as it does on bare asphalt.
 During snowstorms, so much snow can fall that it can trap you in a very short time.
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snowfall or by the condensation or ice that forms on the windows of the car.
 On the other hand, in many countries the conditions of ice and snow are normal and the traffic flows almost without any interruption throughout the year.
 Safaris are probably Africa's greatest tourist attraction and the most memorable part of the trip for many visitors.
 The popular use of the term safari refers to overland trips to see the amazing wildlife of Africa, particularly in the savannah.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, are often drawn to vehicles and standard equipment will make good viewing possible.
 Occasionally, lions, cheetahs and leopards can be shy, so you will have more opportunity to observe them using binoculars.
 The excursion known as walking safari (also called «walking safari», «walking safari» or «walking safari») consists of hiking, either for a few hours or for several days.
 The Paralympic Games will take place between 24 August and 5 September 2021, with a number of events taking place in other parts of Japan.
 Host of the 1964 Games, Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympics.
 If you booked your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the postponement was announced, you may face complications.
 There are different types of travel cancellation policies, but as of late March, the coverage of most of these policies based on the coronavirus does not extend until July 2020, which is when the Olympics are scheduled.
 Most event tickets are expected to cost between JPY 2500 and JPY 130 000, and common passes are expected to cost JPY 7000.
 Ironing clothes while they are still damp can help dry them. Many hotels have an iron and ironing board for guests to use, even if they are not in the room.
 If you do not have an iron available, or do not want to use ironed sheets, you can try a hair dryer, if available.
 Be careful not to let the fabric get too hot, as it could shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 There are several methods of water purification, some of which are more effective against specific threats.
 In some places, it is enough to boil water for a minute, in others, several more are necessary.
 Not all filters are equally effective and, if this concerns you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 Travellers may encounter pests of which they are not aware in the regions from which they come.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation or, in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals through the use of their strength, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 Duty-free shopping offers an opportunity to purchase, in certain locations, products free of customs duties and excise taxes.
 Travellers visiting countries with high taxation can sometimes save a significant amount of money, particularly on goods such as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway, the section between Point Marion and Fairmont is the most challenging driving conditions and often travels remote and lonely terrain.
 If you do not usually drive on rural roads, stay alert: there are many steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than in the previous and following sections, typically 35 to 40 mph (56-64 km/h), and their strict compliance is even more important than in any other section.
 Curiously, however, cell phone service is much better here than in many other sections of the road, like Pennsylvania Wilds.
 German pastry is of good quality and, in Bavaria, cakes are quite tasty and varied, similar to those prepared in Austria, its southern neighbour.
 Fruit pies are common, with apples baked inside all year round and cherries and plums appearing in the summer.
 Many of the German baked goods also have almonds, hazelnuts and other nuts. In general, popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you have a craving for small but tasty cakes, try the Berliner, also called Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a recipe based on herbs and spices and served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry «dry» and «wet», depending on the volume of liquid.
 In the villages of the northern interior of India and Pakistan, yogurt is often used in curry. In southern India and other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is common.
 With 17,000 islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic expression that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 However, used without any other qualification, the term tends to refer to the gastronomy originating from the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, now available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the favorite aromas of the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili, sugar (especially coconut Javanese) and various aromatic spices.
 The stirrups are the supports for the feet of the riders that hang on both sides of the saddle.
 While they provide more stability for the rider, they can present safety issues, as it is possible for their feet to get stuck in them.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has one foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged if the animal runs away. To reduce the risk, a series of safety precautions exist.
 First, most riders wear riding boots with a heel that is stiff and fairly narrow.
 In addition, there are saddles, especially English ones, with safety bars that allow the stirrup leather to detach from its structure if a rider who is thrown off pulls backwards.
 The Cochamó Valley is Chile's most popular climbing destination and is known as South America's Yosemite, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The summits also offer stunning views from the peaks. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of infinite potential.
 Downhill snow sports, such as skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that consist of sliding on skis or a board attached to the feet, over snowy terrain.
 Skiing is a major travel activity with many devotees, sometimes called "ski bums", who organize their holidays entirely around skiing at a specific location.
 The idea of skiing is very old, as there are cave paintings that represent skiers and that date back to around 5,000 BC.
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates back to the 17th century. In 1861, Norwegians founded the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Ski touring: also known as backcountry skiing, touring or ski mountaineering.
 While they are linked, in general it does not involve practicing the cross-country skiing or alpine mountaineering, developed on slopes of pronounced slope and with skis and footwear much more rigid.
 Imagine the ski trail as a hiking trail.
 In good conditions, you will be able to cover a little more distance than if you were walking, but you will rarely reach the speed of cross-country skiing without a heavy pack on groomed trails.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Under normal circumstances, travelling through several countries would mean having to handle visa applications and passport controls several times.
 However, the Schengen area functions as a single country in this respect.
 Generally, as long as you move within this region you will be able to cross borders without passing through a passport control post again.
 Similarly, with a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a permit for each of the member countries of this area separately, which will save you time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal criterion that determines when a manufactured good can be considered an antique. Some tax agencies have established that objects over 100 years old are antiques.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more narrowly defined in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that products made in an artisan way are cataloged as antiques, even though they are newer than goods of similar characteristics manufactured in series.
 Reindeer husbandry is a fundamental means of livelihood among the Lapp and the culture related to this commercial activity is important for many who are engaged in other professions.
 Even so, even traditionally, not all the Lapp people have been engaged in large-scale reindeer herding, but have lived from fishing, hunting and other similar activities, using reindeer mainly as draft animals.
 Today, many Lapp people work in modern commercial activities. Tourism is an important source of income in Lapland, the Sámi region.
 While it is used extensively, especially among non-Roma, the term Gypsy is often given a pejorative connotation, as it is associated with negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions of Roma.
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, this could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 You may want to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are designed for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor in the Middle East might face situations that are different from those of a European or an Arab.
 Travel warnings are only a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The views presented are often superficial, generic and overly simplified compared to the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 The term severe weather refers, in general, to any risky climatic phenomenon that is capable of causing damage, serious social alterations or the death of people.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere on the planet and there are different types depending on geography, topography and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, landslides, excessive rainfall and forest fires are types and consequences of extreme weather, as are lightning storms, tornadoes, water spouts or cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal climatic phenomena are dust storms, snowstorms, ice storms, and sandstorms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to research any extreme weather risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Anyone planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is likely that by searching for "Hostile Zone Course" on the Internet you will find the address of a local company.
 A course will normally cover all the topics that have been dealt with here in much more detail and, in general, with practical experience.
 A course typically lasts between 2 and 5 days, and includes role-playing games, first aid, and sometimes even weapons training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled sex-change surgery in another country should make sure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments regarding the possibility of issuing passports without gender declaration (X) or updated documents in order to match the name of the person with the gender with which he or she feels identified is varied.
 The willingness of foreign governments to honor these documents varies widely.
 Security screening at airports has become more invasive since September 11.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not have to go through scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 Return currents are the flow that recedes from the breaking waves, often on a reef or similar.
 Because of the submarine topography, the return flow gathers in certain deeper areas and there it can originate a fast current with direction to deep waters.
 Most of the deaths occur because of the fatigue that comes from trying to swim against the current, which may be impossible.
 Once you have escaped from the current, swimming back will not be more complex than usual.
 Try to get somewhere where you can't get back or, if you have the skills and someone has seen you, it might be wise to wait for rescue.
 The impact of returning home occurs before the cultural one (there is no period of happiness of «honeymoon»), it takes longer to go away and it can be more difficult.
 Travelers who have found it easy to adapt to a new culture sometimes have great difficulty in adapting to their native culture again.
 When he returns to his home after living abroad, he will have adapted to that new culture and will have lost some of the habits of his native culture.
 When you traveled abroad the first time, people were probably patient and understanding, because they knew that travelers need to adjust to a new country.
 People may not realize that tolerance and understanding are also needed for travelers returning to their homes.
 The pyramid light and sound show is one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the dark, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 You will generally hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times. The history of sound and light is like a story book.
 The Sphinx appears as a backdrop and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are projected on the pyramids and all of them are illuminated.
 The discovery of the South Shetland Islands occurred in 1819 and several nations claim them. They have the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 km north of the mainland. The largest island is King George, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston Island and Deception, where there is a spectacular natural harbor formed by the flooded caldera of an active volcano.
 Ellsworth Land, whose boundaries are defined by the Bellingshausen Sea, is a region located south of the peninsula.
 Here, the mountains of the Peninsula mix with the plateau and then rise again to form the 360 km long Ellsworth Mountains, divided in two by the Minnesota Glacier.
 In the northern sector, Sentinel Range, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with a summit at 4,892 metres on Mount Vinson.
 In remote areas where cellular coverage is not available, a satellite phone could be your only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be compared to a mobile phone, because to make a call, you must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in waterborne transportation, including recreational vessels, as well as for expeditions requiring remote data and voice.
 You can contact your local telephone service provider for more information on how to sign up for this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a popular option for those planning to take a gap year.
 This is very popular among high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before university without jeopardizing their education.
 In many cases, enrolling in a study abroad program for a year can, in fact, increase the chances of accessing higher education once you return to your home country.
 Usually, a tuition fee will be charged to enroll in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing: the “land of a thousand lakes” also has thousands of islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 A yacht is not always necessary on archipelagos and lakes.
 While the coastal archipelagos and larger lakes are large enough for any yacht, smaller craft or even a kayak offer a different experience.
 Boating is a national recreational activity in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight inhabitants.
 The same is true in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but, apart from that, it is quite unique (e.g., in the Netherlands the ratio is one to forty).
 Most exclusive cruises that travel through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return journey, sleeping on the boat overnight.
 If you only disembark during excursions on board, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 In the brochures of some cruises, Berlin, Germany is shown. However, as can be seen in the map above, the city is not near the sea and its visit is not included in the price of the cruise.
 Flying can be scary for people of any age and background, particularly if they have never been through the experience or if they have lived through a traumatic situation.
 There should be no shame in this: it is no different from other types of personal fears and dislikes that afflict so many others.
 For some, understanding a little about how planes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a feeling of not being in control.
 Delivery companies are paid very well to make fast deliveries. Often, time is very important when it comes to business documents, merchandise, or urgent repairs.
 Large companies have their own planes on some routes, but there was a problem for smaller companies and other routes.
 If they shipped by air freight, in some routes they may have been delayed days in the unloading and customs.
 The only option to do it faster was to send it as checked baggage. Airline regulations prohibit transporting baggage without a passenger, and this is where you come in.
 The obvious way to travel first class or business class on an airplane is to spend a fortune for the privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for it).
 But there is a price to pay: in general, you can pay up to four times more for the economy class and up to eleven times more for the business class.
 It is usually a waste of time to look for discounts for first class or business class seats on direct flights.
 Airlines are well aware that there is a core group of travellers who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting somewhere quickly and comfortably, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau. Its regional language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a republic composed of many ethnic groups, among which there have been conflicts of that nature.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria, east of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but which is not recognized by any member state of the UN.
 Despite the failure of political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been re-established.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Izmir is the third most important city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million inhabitants, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transport hub.
 What was once the ancient city of Ephesus is now a modern, developed and busy metropolis, established around a large bay and surrounded by mountains.
 Both the wide boulevards and the mirrored facades of the shopping malls are dotted with traditional red-tiled roofs from the 18th-century market and the old mosques and churches, yet the atmosphere is more Mediterranean Europe than traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvík has excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and has an atypical octagonal church.
 In the cemetery, there are interesting marble sculptures in the shape of a dove on some tombs.
 It is worth spending half an hour to walk around the fascinating village.
 To the north and within easy reach is the romantic and stunning city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners after a vivid account of its splendours by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, you should visit, to the north, the great Sanctuary of Our Lady of Fatima (Sanctuary) which is a place where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 Remember that, basically, you are visiting a place that served as a mass grave and is also a site of almost invaluable significance to a significant part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women alive who survived their stay in this place and many more who had loved ones who were murdered or worked there until their death, both Jewish and non-Jewish.
 Give the place all the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not joke about the Holocaust or Nazism.
 Do not ruin the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 Catalan and Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona. About half of its people prefer to speak Catalan, the vast majority understand it and practically everyone knows Spanish.
 However, because Catalan is legally the first official language, most of the signs are written only in that language.
 Still, Spanish is also widely used in public transportation and other buildings.
 While the usual announcements in the Metro are only displayed in Catalan, unscheduled interruptions are made in a wide variety of languages through an automatic program in a wide variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude, and arrogant.
 Although it is often just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to have a good time in Paris is to behave as well as possible, like a well-bred person. This will make moving around there much easier.
 A few courtesies on your part will quickly dispel the apparent brusque manners of the Parisians.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is very wooded, with mainly beech, fir and spruce, and has a mixed alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a wide and extraordinary range of vegetal communities, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitudes.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European brown bear, the wolf, the eagle, the owl, the lynx, the wild cat and the capercaillie are some of the exotic animals, among many other ordinary creatures, that can be found in the place.
 During visits to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover their knees and cannot wear their shoulders exposed.
 While almost all monasteries give shelters to women who arrive unprepared, if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monk or nun will smile at you at the entrance.
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 This can also be borrowed from the clothes available when you enter, but that clothing is not washed after each person who wears it, so it might not feel comfortable wearing these skirts. A one-size-fits-all for all men!
 The cuisine of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, especially in summer. It is a bread with olive oil, tomato and any other ingredient such as cheese or tuna, among others.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie for 'you', are always capitalized, even if they are in the middle of a sentence.
 It is a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 It can also be said that it simplifies the reading, although its writing is somewhat complex, since it is necessary to find out if a verb or adjective is used in a substantivated form.
 Speaking Italian is relatively easy, since most of its words sound the same as they are written.
 The c and the g are the letters that you have to be most careful with, as they are pronounced differently depending on the vowel that follows them.
 Also, be sure to respect the difference in pronunciation of the r and the rr. For example, caro means expensive, while carro means car.
 Persian has a relatively simple and mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar rules and achieve a better understanding of the sentences.
 It goes without saying that if you speak a Romance language, you will find it easier to learn Portuguese.
 Nevertheless, those who speak some Spanish may reach the hasty conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 Nowadays, pre-modern observatories have generally become obsolete and remain in operation as museums or educational destinations.
 Since, in their heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is common to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are built in modern times.
 Most current research telescopes consist of immense structures installed in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of cherry blossoms, called hanami, is traditional in Japan since the 8th century.
 The concept came from China, where the plum blossom was the most appreciated.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first cherry blossom celebrations, only for him and other members of the Imperial Court aristocracy.
 Plants look best when they are in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to snip off “just one” specimen.
 If you collect "specimens" during a visit to a formally organized garden, you will be asked to leave, without discussion.
 Generally, Singapore is a very safe place to be and very easy to get around; plus, you can buy almost any product from the moment you arrive.
 But, due to its location in the “high tropics,” a few degrees north of the equator, you will always have to deal with heat and, when the sky is clear, with strong sun, which happens less often.
 Some buses also head north to Hebron, where, according to the Bible, the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives are buried.
 He should check that the bus he is getting on is going to Hebron and not just to Kiryat Arba, a Jewish settlement near there.
 Inland waterways can be a good holiday theme.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or traveling by boat on the Erie Canal.
 They also delineate routes for popular hiking and cycling trails.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are numerous traditions related to this holiday that have also been incorporated by non-believers in both Christian and non-Christian countries around the globe.
 It is traditional to spend Easter night on a hillside to watch the sunrise.
 There are, of course, Christian theological explanations of this tradition, but it may well be a pre-Christian ritual of spring and fertility.
 Traditional churches often offer a Paschal Vigil on Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and congregations generally begin celebrating the resurrection of Christ as soon as midnight strikes.
 All animals that originally arrived on the islands came to this place by swimming, flying or floating.
 Because they are so far from the mainland, mammals never reached the islands, leaving the giant tortoise as the main grazing animal on the Galapagos.
 Many mammalian species have been introduced to the Galapagos since humans arrived on the archipelago, such as goats, horses, cows, and sheep, or rodents, dogs, and cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you will experience polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will remain dark for almost the entire day, it is a great opportunity to contemplate the northern lights.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in these regions and the fact that, as a result, there are no light pollution problems, you can also enjoy the stars.
 In Japan, the work culture has a more vertical and formal structure than what westerners are possibly used to.
 The typical business attire is suits and coats, and co-workers are addressed by their last names or job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is paramount, where group efforts are emphasized over focusing on the praise of individual achievements.
 Often, workers must get approval from their superiors to make decisions and are expected to follow instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.3169989638262784, 'precisions': [0.6342791849171586, 0.380976904488373, 0.25058808963724155, 0.16675998105000214], 'brevity_penalty': 1.0, 'length_ratio': 1.062052505966587, 'translation_length': 26255, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 60.817722381388336, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}